Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. LEGISLATION

CHAPTER 318. REVIEW OF REGULATORY PROGRAMS

Sec. 318.001. FINDINGS. The legislature finds that:

(1) the interests of the residents of the state are served by the regulation of certain professions and other occupations;

(2) state government actions have produced a substantial increase in the number of regulatory programs;

(3) the legislature should review proposed regulatory programs to better evaluate the need for the programs; and

(4) regulation should not be imposed on any profession or other occupation unless required for the protection of the health, safety, or welfare of the residents of the state.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 9.01(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 318.002. CONSIDERATIONS. In evaluating whether a profession or other occupation should be regulated, the following factors should be considered:

(1) whether the unregulated practice of a profession or other occupation may significantly harm or endanger the public health, safety, or welfare and whether the potential for harm is easily recognizable and not remote or dependent on tenuous argument;

(2) whether the practice of a profession or other occupation requires specialized skill or training and whether the public clearly needs and will benefit by assurances of initial and continuing competence of practitioners of the profession or occupation;

(3) whether the regulation would have the effect of directly or indirectly increasing the cost of any goods or services and, if so, whether the increase would be more harmful to the public than the harm that might result from the absence of regulation;

(4) whether the regulatory process would significantly reduce competition in the field and, if so, whether the reduction would be more harmful to the public than the harm that might result from the absence of regulation; and

(5) whether the residents of the state are or may be effectively protected by other means.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 9.01(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.

Sec. 318.003. FORMS OF REGULATION. (a) If the legislature finds that it is necessary to impose regulation on a profession or other occupation not regulated before August 26, 1985, regulation should be implemented in the least restrictive manner available in the following order:

(1) implementation of a system of registration by which practitioners of the profession or occupation register with a designated state agency, but without the imposition of prequalifications or requirements for issuance of the registration other than payment of a fee, and grounds may be established for suspension or revocation of the registration or other discipline of the registrant;

(2) implementation of a system of licensure by which a practitioner receives recognition by the state that the practitioner has met predetermined qualifications, and persons not so licensed are prohibited from practicing the licensed profession or occupation, and grounds may be established for suspension or revocation of the license or other discipline of the licensee.

(b) Alternative methods of regulation should be implemented when necessary and appropriate in specific cases.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 2, Sec. 9.01(a), eff. Aug. 28, 1989.